North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 20. Absentee Ballot.

§ 163-226.
Who may vote an absentee ballot.

Who May Vote Absentee Ballot; Generally. — Any qualified voter of the State may vote by absentee ballot in a statewide primary, general, or special election on constitutional amendments, referenda or bond proposals, and any qualified voter of a county
is authorized to vote by absentee ballot in any primary or election conducted by the county board of elections, in the manner provided in this Article.

Annual Request by Person With Sickness or Physical Disability. — If the applicant reports that the voter has a sickness or physical disability that is expected to last the remainder of the calendar year, the voter may request to vote by mail-in absentee
ballot for all of the primaries and elections held during the calendar year when the completed written request under

G.S. 163-230.1

is received.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-136, s. 1, effective July 19, 2019, and applicable to fire district elections held on or after that date.

The Term “Election”. — As used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term “election” includes a general, primary, second primary, runoff election, bond election, referendum, or special election.

The Term “Verifiable Legal Guardian.” — An individual appointed guardian under Chapter 35A of the General Statutes. For a corporation appointed as a guardian under that Chapter, the corporation may submit a list of 10 named individuals to the State Board
of Elections who may act for that corporation under this Article.

For the purpose of this Article, “near relative” means spouse, brother, sister, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, mother-in-law, father-in-law, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, stepparent, or stepchild.

History.
1939, c. 159, s. 1; 1963, c. 457, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; c. 952, s. 1; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; c. 1018; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1979, c. 140, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 561, s. 1; c. 734, s. 5; 1999-455, s. 1; 2001-337,
s. 1; 2001-507, s. 1; 2013-381, s. 4.5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-136, s. 1; 2019-239, ss. 1.2(a), 1.3(b).

Local Modification to Former

G.S. 163-54

to 163-69.1.

Graham: 1959, c. 780, s. 1; Jackson: 1939, c. 309; Sampson: 1941, c. 167; 1963, c. 882.

Cross References.

For present provisions covering the subject matter of former subsection (d) of this section as it existed prior to the 1977 amendment, see

G.S. 163-226.1

.

§ 163-226.1.
Absentee voting in primary.

A qualified voter may vote by absentee ballot in a partisan primary provided the qualified voter is affiliated, at the time the qualified voter makes application for absentee ballots, with the political party in whose primary the qualified voter wishes
to vote, except that an unaffiliated voter may vote in a party primary if permitted under

G.S. 163-119

. The official registration records of the county in which the voter is registered shall be proof of whether the qualified voter is affiliated with a political party and of the party, if any, with which the qualified
voter is affiliated.

History.
1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1999-455, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-226.2.
Absentee voting in municipal elections.

Absentee voting by qualified voters residing in a municipality shall be in accordance with the authorization specified in

G.S. 163-302

.

History.
1977, c. 469, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-226.3.
Certain acts declared felonies.

Any person who shall, in connection with absentee voting in any election held in this State, do any of the acts or things declared in this section to be unlawful, shall be guilty of a Class I felony. It shall be unlawful:

For any person except the voter’s near relative or the voter’s verifiable legal guardian to assist the voter to vote an absentee ballot when the voter is voting an absentee ballot other than under the procedure described in

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6; provided that if there is not a near relative or legal guardian available to assist the voter, the voter may request some other person to give assistance.

For any person to assist a voter to vote an absentee ballot under the absentee voting procedure authorized by

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 except as provided in that section.

For a voter who votes an absentee ballot under the procedures authorized by G.S. 163-227.2, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 to vote that voter’s absentee ballot outside of the voting booth or private room provided to the voter for that purpose in or adjacent
to the office of the county board of elections or at the additional site provided by G.S. 163-227.2, or to receive assistance except as provided in G.S. 163-227.2, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6.

For any owner, manager, director, employee, or other person, other than the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, to (i) make a written request pursuant to

G.S. 163-230.1

or (ii) sign an application or certificate as a witness, on behalf of a registered voter, who is a patient in any hospital, clinic, nursing home or rest home in this State or for any owner, manager, director,
employee, or other person other than the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, to mark the voter’s absentee ballot or assist such a voter in marking an absentee ballot. This subdivision does not apply to members,
employees, or volunteers of the county board of elections, if those members, employees, or volunteers are working as part of a multipartisan team trained and authorized by the county board of elections to assist voters
with absentee ballots. Each county board of elections shall train and authorize such teams, pursuant to procedures which shall be adopted by the State Board of Elections. If neither the voter’s near relative nor a verifiable
legal guardian is available to assist the voter, and a multipartisan team is not available to assist the voter within seven calendar days of a telephonic request to the county board of elections, the voter may obtain such
assistance from any person other than (i) an owner, manager, director, employee of the hospital, clinic, nursing home, or rest home in which the voter is a patient or resident; (ii) an individual who holds any elective
office under the United States, this State, or any political subdivision of this State; (iii) an individual who is a candidate for nomination or election to such office; or (iv) an individual who holds any office in a State,
congressional district, county, or precinct political party or organization, or who is a campaign manager or treasurer for any candidate or political party; provided that a delegate to a convention shall not be considered
a party office. None of the persons listed in (i) through (iv) of this subdivision may sign the application or certificate as a witness for the patient.

For any person to take into that person’s possession for delivery to a voter or for return to a county board of elections the absentee ballot of any voter, provided, however, that this prohibition shall not apply to a voter’s near relative or the voter’s
verifiable legal guardian.

Except as provided in subsections (1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section, G.S. 163-231(a), and G.S. 163-227.2(e), for any voter to permit another person to assist the voter in marking that voter’s absentee ballot, to be in the voter’s presence when a voter
votes an absentee ballot, or to observe the voter mark that voter’s absentee ballot.

The State Board of Elections or a county board of elections, upon receipt of a sworn affidavit from any qualified voter of the State or the county, as the case may be, attesting to first-person knowledge of any violation of subsection (a) of this section,
shall transmit that affidavit to the appropriate district attorney, who shall investigate and prosecute any person violating subsection (a).

For the purposes of this section, a “multipartisan team” shall consist of at least two registered voters of the county. The two political parties having the highest number of affiliated voters in the State, as reflected by the registration statistics
published by the State Board on January 1 of the current year, shall each be represented by at least one team member of the party’s affiliation, as recommended by the members of that political party serving on the county board
of elections. If the team consists of more than two members, voters who are unaffiliated or affiliated with other political parties recognized by the State may be team members. If a county board of elections finds an insufficient
number of voters available to meet this requirement, the county board of elections, upon a unanimous vote of all of its sworn members, may appoint an unaffiliated team member to serve instead of a team member representing one of
the two political parties having the highest number of affiliated voters in the State.

History.
1979, c. 799, s. 4; 1983, c. 331, s. 2; 1985, c. 563, s. 4; 1987, c. 565, s. 7; c. 583, ss. 8, 10; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1999-455, s. 3; 2005-428, s. 5(b); 2007-391, s. 29(a); 2013-381, s. 4.6(a); 2014-111, s. 15(a); 2017-6,
s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(d); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-17, s. 2.5(a).

§ 163-227.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-455, s. 4, effective January 1, 2000.

§ 163-227.1.
Second primary; applications for absentee ballots for voting in second primary.

A voter applying for an absentee ballot for a primary election who will be eligible to vote under this Article on the day of the primary and second primary shall be permitted by the county board of elections to indicate that fact on that voter’s application
and that voter shall automatically be issued an application and absentee ballot for the second primary if one is called. The county board of elections shall consider that indication a separate request for application for the second
primary and, at the proper time, shall enter that voter’s name in the absentee register along with the listing of other applicants for absentee ballots for the second primary.

In addition, a voter entitled to absentee ballots under the provisions of this Article who did not make application for the primary or who failed to apply for a second primary ballot at the time of application for a first primary ballot may make a written
request for absentee ballots for a second primary not earlier than the day a second primary is called and not later than the date and time provided by

G.S. 163-230.1

.

All procedures with respect to absentee ballots in a second primary shall be the same as with respect to absentee ballots in a first primary except as otherwise provided by this section.

History.
1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1981, c. 560, s. 1; 1985, c. 600, s. 3; 1999-455, s. 5; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-227.2.
Alternate procedures for requesting application for absentee ballot; “one-stop” voting procedure in board office.

Any voter eligible to vote by absentee ballot under

G.S. 163-226

may request an application for absentee ballots, complete the application, and vote under the provisions of

G.S. 163-227.5

and

G.S. 163-227.6

.

Not earlier than the third Thursday before an election, in which absentee ballots are authorized, in which a voter seeks to vote and not later than 3:00 P.M. on the last Saturday before that election, the voter shall appear in person only at the office
of the county board of elections, except as provided in

G.S. 163-227.6

. A county board of elections shall conduct one-stop voting on the last Saturday before the election from 8:00 A.M. until 3:00 P.M. That voter shall enter the voting enclosure at the board office through the appropriate
entrance and shall at once state his or her name and place of residence to an authorized member or employee of the board and present photo identification in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.16

. In a primary election, the voter shall also state the political party with which the voter affiliates and in whose primary the voter desires to vote, or if the voter is an unaffiliated voter permitted to vote in
the primary of a particular party under

G.S. 163-119

, the voter shall state the name of the authorizing political party in whose primary he wishes to vote. The board member or employee to whom the voter gives this information shall announce the name and residence
of the voter in a distinct tone of voice. After examining the registration records, an employee of the board shall state whether the person seeking to vote is duly registered. If the voter is found to be registered that voter may
request that the authorized member or employee of the board furnish the voter with an application for absentee ballots. The voter shall complete the application in the presence of the authorized member or employee of the board,
and shall deliver the application to that person.

If the application is properly filled out, the authorized member or employee shall enter the voter’s name in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued and shall furnish the voter with the ballots to which the application for
absentee ballots applies. The voter thereupon shall vote in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.All actions required by this subsection shall be performed in the office of the board of elections, except that the voting
may take place in an adjacent room as provided by subsection (e) of this section. The application under this subsection shall be signed in the presence of the chair, member, director of elections of the board, or full-time employee,
authorized by the board who shall sign the application and certificate as the witness and indicate the official title held by him or her. Notwithstanding G.S. 163-231(a), in the case of this subsection, only one witness shall be
required on the certificate.

Only the chairman, member, employee, or director of elections of the board shall keep the voter’s application for absentee ballots in a safe place, separate and apart from other applications and container-return envelopes. If the voter’s application for
absentee ballots is disapproved by the board, the board shall so notify the voter stating the reason for disapproval by first-class mail addressed to the voter at that voter’s residence address and at the address shown in the application
for absentee ballots; and the board shall enter a challenge under

G.S. 163-89

.

The voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in a voting booth in the office of the county board of elections, and the county board of elections shall provide a voting booth for that purpose, provided however, that the county board of elections may
in the alternative provide a private room for the voter adjacent to the office of the board, in which case the voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in that room. A voter at a one-stop site shall be entitled to the same
assistance as a voter at a voting place on election day under

G.S. 163-166.8

. The State Board shall, where appropriate, adapt the rules it adopts under

G.S. 163-166.8

. to one-stop voting.

At any site where one-stop absentee voting is conducted, there shall be a curtained or otherwise private area where the voter may mark the ballot unobserved.

A voter who has moved within the county more than 30 days before election day but has not reported the move to the board of elections shall not be required on that account to vote a provisional ballot at the one-stop site, as long as the one-stop site
has available all the information necessary to determine whether a voter is registered to vote in the county and which ballot the voter is eligible to vote based on the voter’s proper residence address. The voter with that kind
of unreported move shall be allowed to vote the same kind of absentee ballot as other one-stop voters.

Notwithstanding the exception specified in

G.S. 163-36

, counties which operate a modified full-time office shall remain open five days each week during regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections, commencing
with the date prescribed in G.S. 163-227.2(b) and continuing until 5:00 P.M. on the Friday prior to that election and shall also be open on the last Saturday before the election. A county board may conduct one-stop absentee voting
during evenings or on weekends, as long as the hours are part of a plan submitted and approved according to subsection (g) of this section The boards of county commissioners shall provide necessary funds for the additional operation
of the office during that time.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 163-89(a) and (b), a challenge may be entered against a voter at a one-stop site under subsection (g) of this section or during one-stop voting at the county board office. The challenge may be entered by a person
conducting one-stop voting under

G.S. 163-227.5

and

G.S. 163-227.6

or by another registered voter who resides in the same precinct as the voter being challenged. If challenged at the place where one-stop voting occurs, the voter shall be allowed to cast a ballot in the same way
as other voters. The challenge shall be made on forms prescribed by the State Board. The challenge shall be heard by the county board of elections in accordance with the procedures set forth in G.S. 163-89(e).

History.
1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1975, c. 844, s. 12; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 107, s. 14; c. 799, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 305, s. 2; 1985, c. 600, s. 4; 1987, c. 583, s. 4; 1989, c. 520; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 991,
s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 53; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; c. 509, ss. 117, 118; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 561, s. 4; 1997-510, s. 2; 1999-455, s. 6; 2000-136, s. 2; 2001-319, s. 5(a)-(c); 2001-337, s. 2; 2001-353, s. 9; 2003-278,
s. 11; 2005-428, ss. 5(a), 6(a), 7; 2007-253, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 34(a); 2009-541, s. 23; 2013-381, ss. 2.7, 16.5, 25.1, 25.2, 25.3, 30.7; 2014-111, s. 3; 2015-103, ss 6(b), 8(b), (c); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.11(b); 2018-112, s.
1; 2018-129, s. 1(a); 2018-144, ss. 1.4(b), 3.4(e), (f); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 2(a).

Local Modification.

Durham: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Gaston: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Guilford: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Mecklenburg: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Orange: 1983, c. 192; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 978; Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 568, s. 1; Randolph:
1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Union County: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Wake: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Watauga: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Wilson: 1995 (Reg. Sess. 1996), c. 599, s. 1; town of Columbia: 2011-132;
Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 9 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

Cross References.

As to in-person registration and voting at one-stop absentee voting sites, see

G.S. 163-82.6

A.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-227.2. Alternate procedures for requesting application for absentee ballot; “one-stop” voting procedure in board office

Any voter eligible to vote by absentee ballot under

G.S. 163-226

may request an application for absentee ballots, complete the application, and vote under the provisions of this section and of

G.S. 163-82.6

A, as applicable.

Not earlier than the third Thursday before an election, in which absentee ballots are authorized, in which a voter seeks to vote and not later than 1:00 P.M. on the last Saturday before that election, the voter shall appear in person only at the office
of the county board of elections, provided in subsection (g) of this section. A county board of elections shall conduct one-stop voting on the last Saturday before the election until 1:00 P.M. and may conduct it until 5:00 P.M.
on that Saturday. That voter shall enter the voting enclosure at the board office through the appropriate entrance and shall at once state his or her name and place of residence to an authorized member or employee of the board.

If the application is properly filled out, the authorized member or employee shall enter the voter’s name in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued and shall furnish the voter with the ballots to which the application for
absentee ballots applies. The voter thereupon shall vote in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

Only the chairman, member, employee, or director of elections of the board shall keep the voter’s application for absentee ballots in a safe place, separate and apart from other applications and container-return envelopes. If the voter’s application for
absentee ballots is disapproved by the board, the board shall so notify the voter stating the reason for disapproval by first-class mail addressed to the voter at that voter’s residence address and at the address shown in the application
for absentee ballots; and the board shall enter a challenge under

G.S. 163-89

.

The voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in a voting booth in the office of the county board of elections, and the county board of elections shall provide a voting booth for that purpose, provided however, that the county board of elections may
in the alternative provide a private room for the voter adjacent to the office of the board, in which case the voter shall vote that voter’s absentee ballot in that room. A voter at a one-stop site shall be entitled to the same
assistance as a voter at a voting place on election day under

G.S. 163-166.8

. The State Board of Elections shall, where appropriate, adapt the rules it adopts under

G.S. 163-166.8

to one-stop voting.

Notwithstanding the exception specified in

G.S. 163-36

, counties which operate a modified full-time office shall remain open five days each week during regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections, commencing
with the date prescribed in G.S. 163-227.2(b) and continuing until 5:00 P.M. on the Friday prior to that election and shall also be open on the last Saturday before the election. A county board may conduct one-stop absentee voting
during evenings or on weekends, as long as the hours are part of a plan submitted and approved according to subsection (g) of this section. The boards of county commissioners shall provide necessary funds for the additional operation
of the office during that time.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a county board of elections by unanimous vote of all its members may provide for one or more sites in that county for absentee ballots to be applied for and cast under this section. Every individual
staffing any of those sites shall be a member or full-time employee of the county board of elections or an employee of the county board of elections whom the board has given training equivalent to that given a full-time employee.
Those sites must be approved by the State Board of Elections as part of a Plan for Implementation approved by both the county board of elections and by the State Board of Elections which shall also provide adequate security of
the ballots and provisions to avoid allowing persons to vote who have already voted. The Plan for Implementation shall include a provision for the presence of political party observers at each one-stop site equivalent to the provisions
in

G.S. 163-45

for party observers at voting places on election day. A county board of elections may propose in its Plan not to offer one-stop voting at the county board of elections office; the State Board may approve that proposal
in a Plan only if the Plan includes at least one site reasonably proximate to the county board of elections office and the State Board finds that the sites in the Plan as a whole provide adequate coverage of the county’s electorate.
If a county board of elections has considered a proposed Plan or Plans for Implementation and has been unable to reach unanimity in favor of a Plan, a member or members of that county board of elections may petition the State Board
of Elections to adopt a plan for it. If petitioned, the State Board may also receive and consider alternative petitions from another member or members of that county board. The State Board of Elections may adopt a Plan for that
county. The State Board, in that plan, shall take into consideration factors including geographic, demographic, and partisan interests of that county.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 163-89(a) and (b), a challenge may be entered against a voter at a one-stop site under subsection (g) of this section or during one-stop voting at the county board office. The challenge may be entered by a person
conducting one-stop voting under this section or by another registered voter who resides in the same precinct as the voter being challenged. If challenged at the place where one-stop voting occurs, the voter shall be allowed to
cast a ballot in the same way as other voters. The challenge shall be made on forms prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The challenge shall be heard by the county board of elections in accordance with the procedures set
forth in G.S. 163-89(e).

At any site where one-stop absentee voting is conducted, there shall be a curtained or otherwise private area where the voter may mark the ballot unobserved.

(a1) Repealed by Session Laws 2001-337, s. 2, effective January 1, 2002.

In a primary election, the voter shall also state the political party with which the voter affiliates and in whose primary the voter desires to vote, or if the voter is an unaffiliated voter permitted to vote in the primary of a particular party under

G.S. 163-119

, the voter shall state the name of the authorizing political party in whose primary he wishes to vote. The board member or employee to whom the voter gives this information shall announce the name and residence of the
voter in a distinct tone of voice. After examining the registration records, an employee of the board shall state whether the person seeking to vote is duly registered. If the voter is found to be registered that voter may request
that the authorized member or employee of the board furnish the voter with an application form as specified in

G.S. 163-227

. The voter shall complete the application in the presence of the authorized member or employee of the board, and shall deliver the application to that person.

All actions required by this subsection shall be performed in the office of the board of elections, except that the voting may take place in an adjacent room as provided by subsection (e) of this section. The application under this subsection shall be
signed in the presence of the chair, member, director of elections of the board, or full-time employee, authorized by the board who shall sign the application and certificate as the witness and indicate the official title held by him
or her. Notwithstanding G.S. 163-231(a), in the case of this subsection, only one witness shall be required on the certificate.

(e1)

(Effective until December 1, 2019 — see note)
If a county uses a voting system with retrievable ballots, that county’s board of elections may by resolution elect to conduct one-stop absentee voting according to the provisions of this subsection. In a county in which
the board has opted to do so, a one-stop voter shall cast the ballot and then shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box or voting system in the same manner as if such box or system was in use in a precinct on election day. At the
end of each business day, or at any time when there will be no employee or officer of the board of elections on the premises, the ballot box or system shall be secured in accordance with a plan approved by the State Board of Elections,
which shall include that no additional ballots have been placed in the box or system. Any county board desiring to conduct one-stop voting according to this subsection shall submit a plan for doing so to the State Board of Elections.
The State Board shall adopt standards for conducting one-stop voting under this subsection and shall approve any county plan that adheres to its standards. The county board shall adhere to its State Board-approved plan. The plan shall
provide that each one-stop ballot shall have a ballot number on it in accordance with G.S. 163-230.1(a2), or shall have an equivalent identifier to allow for retrievability. The standards shall address retrievability in one-stop voting
on direct record electronic equipment where no paper ballot is used.

(e1)

(Effective December 1, 2019 — see note)
If a county uses a voting system with retrievable ballots, that county’s board of elections may by resolution elect to conduct one-stop absentee voting according to the provisions of this subsection. In a county in which
the board has opted to do so, a one-stop voter shall cast the ballot and then shall deposit the ballot in the ballot box or voting system in the same manner as if such box or system was in use in a precinct on election day. At the
end of each business day, or at any time when there will be no employee or officer of the board of elections on the premises, the ballot box or system shall be secured in accordance with a plan approved by the State Board of Elections,
which shall include that no additional ballots have been placed in the box or system. Any county board desiring to conduct one-stop voting according to this subsection shall submit a plan for doing so to the State Board of Elections.
The State Board shall adopt standards for conducting one-stop voting under this subsection and shall approve any county plan that adheres to its standards. The county board shall adhere to its State Board-approved plan. The plan shall
provide that each one-stop ballot shall have a ballot number on it in accordance with G.S. 163-230.1(a2), or shall have an equivalent identifier to allow for retrievability.

(e2) A voter who has moved within the county more than 30 days before election day but has not reported the move to the board of elections shall not be required on that account to vote a provisional ballot at the one-stop site, as long as the one-stop
site has available all the information necessary to determine whether a voter is registered to vote in the county and which ballot the voter is eligible to vote based on the voter’s proper residence address. The voter with that kind
of unreported move shall be allowed to vote the same kind of absentee ballot as other one-stop voters. (f) Notwithstanding the exception specified in

G.S. 163-36

, counties which operate a modified full-time office shall remain open five days each week during regular business hours consistent with daily hours presently observed by the county board of elections, commencing with
the date prescribed in G.S. 163-227.2(b) and continuing until 5:00 P.M. on the Friday prior to that election and shall also be open on the last Saturday before the election. A county board may conduct one-stop absentee voting during
evenings or on weekends, as long as the hours are part of a plan submitted and approved according to subsection (g) of this section. The boards of county commissioners shall provide necessary funds for the additional operation of the
office during that time.

(g1) The State Board of Elections shall not approve, either in a Plan approved unanimously by a county board of elections or in an alternative Plan proposed by a member or members of that board, a one-stop site in a building that the county board of elections
is not entitled under

G.S. 163-129

to demand and use as an election-day voting place, unless the State Board of Elections finds that other equally suitable sites were not available and that the use of the sites chosen will not unfairly advantage or disadvantage
geographic, demographic, or partisan interests of that county. In providing the site or sites for one-stop absentee voting under this section, the county board of elections shall make a request to the State, county, city, local school
board, or other entity in control of the building that is supported or maintained, in whole or in part, by or through tax revenues at least 90 days prior to the start of one-stop absentee voting under this section. The request shall
clearly identify the building, or any specific portion thereof, requested the dates and times for which that building or specific portion thereof is requested and the requirement of an area for election related activity. If the State,
local governing board, or other entity in control of the building does not respond to the request within 20 days, the building or specific portion thereof may be used for one-stop absentee voting as stated in the request. If the State,
local governing board, or other entity in control of the building or specific portion thereof responds negatively to the request within 20 days, that entity and the county board of elections shall, in good faith, work to identify a
building or specific portion thereof in which to conduct one-stop absentee voting under this section. If no building or specific portion thereof has been agreed upon within 45 days from the date the county board of elections received
a response to the request, the matter shall be resolved by the State Board of Elections.

§ 163-227.3.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-227.10

at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

§ 163-227.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(j), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1975, c. 844, s. 12; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; c. 626, s. 1; 1979, c. 107, s. 14; c. 799, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 305, s. 2; 1985, c. 600, s. 4; 1987, c. 583, s. 4; 1989, c. 520; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 991,
s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 53; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; c. 509, ss. 117, 118; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 561, s. 4; 1997-510, s. 2; 1999-455, s. 6; 2000-136, s. 2; 2001-319, s. 5(a)-(c); 2001-337, s. 2; 2001-353, s. 9; 2003-278,
s. 11; 2005-428, ss. 5(a), 6(a), 7; 2007-253, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 34(a); 2009-541, s. 23; 2013-381, ss. 2.7, 16.5, 25.1, 25.2, 25.3, 30.7; 2014-111, s. 3; 2015-103, ss 6(b), 8(b), (c); 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by Session Laws 2018-144,
s. 3.1(j), effective December 19, 2018.

Local Modification.

Durham: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Gaston: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Guilford: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Mecklenburg: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Orange: 1983, c. 192; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 978; Pasquotank: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 568, s. 1; Randolph:
1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Union County: 1995, c. 197, s. 1; Wake: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Watauga: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 717, s. 1; Wilson: 1995 (Reg. Sess. 1996), c. 599, s. 1; town of Columbia: 2011-132;
Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 9 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

Cross References.

As to in-person registration and voting at one-stop absentee voting sites, see

G.S. 163-82.6

A.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows: